external/rhvoice/src/scripts/Spanish/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define DefiniteArticle 
el | la | los | las ; 

define IndefiniteArticle 
un | una | unos | unas ; 

define PersonalPronoun 
yo | tú | vos | usted | ustedes | él | ella | ellos | ellas | nosotros | nosotras | vosotros | vosotras ; 

define PersonalReflexivePronoun 
me | mí | se | te | ti | os | nos ; 

define DemonstrativePronoun 
ese | esa | este | esto | esta | eso | esos | esas | estos | estas | aquel | aquella | aquello | aquellos | aquellas ; 

define PossessiveAdjective 
mi | mis | tu | tus | su | sus | nuestro | nuestra | nuestros | nuestras | vuestro | vuestra | vuestros | vuestras ; 

define Preposition 
a | ante | cabe | con | contra | de | desde | durante | en | entre | hacia | hasta | lo | mediante | no | para | por | según | si | sin | so | tras | versus | vía ; 

define UnstressedConjunction 
del | y | ni | e | o | u | tu | sí | como | cuando | porque | pero | pues | que | quien | donde | aunque | mas | sino ; 

define Conjunction 
más | todavía | asimismo | entonces | caso | apenas | excepto ; 

define Ser 
ser | érase | soy | sido | es | somos | sois | son | era | eras | érase | éramos | erais | eran | eres | fue | fuimos | fuiste | fuísteis | fueron | seré | será | serás | serán | seremos | sereis | sería | serías | seríamos | seríais | serían | sea | seas | seamos | seáis | sean ;

define Estar 
estar | estando | estoy | estás | está | están | estamos | estáis | estábais | estaba | estabas | estábamos | estaban | estuve | estuvo | estuvimos | estuviste | estuvísteis | estuviéramos | estuviera | estuvieran | estuvieras | estuviérais | estuvieron | estuviese | estuvieses | estuviésemos | estuviéseis | estuviesen | estaré | estarás | estará | estaremos | estaréis | estarán | estaría | estarías | estaríamos | estaríais | estarían | esté | estés | estemos | estéis | estén ; 

define Tener 
tener | ten | teniendo | tengo | tienes | tiene | tenemos | tienen | tenía | tenías | teníamos | teníais | tenéis | tenían | tuve | tenido | tuvo | tuvimos | tuviste | tuvísteis | tuviera | tuvieran | tuviéramos | tuvieron | tendré | tendrás | tendrá | tendremos | tendréis | tendrán | tendría | tendrías | tendríamos | tendríais | tendrían | tenga | tengan | tengas | tengamos | tengáis | tuvieras | tuviérais | tuviese | tuvieses | tuviésemos | tuviéseis | tuviesen ; 

define Hacer 
hacer | haciendo | harán | hago | haz | haced | hacemos | hacéis | hacen | haces | hice | hizo | hiciste | hicísteis | hicimos | hicieron | hacía | hacías | hacíamos | hacíais | hacían | haré | harás | hará | haremos | haréis | harán | haría | harían | harías | haríamos | haríais | haga | hagas | hagan | hagamos | hagáis | hiciera | hicieran | hicieras | hiciéramos | hiciérais | hiciese | hicieses | hiciésemos | hiciéseis | hiciesen | hecho ; 

define Poder 
puedo | pudiendo | puedes | puede | podemos | podéis | pueden | podía | podías | podíamos | podíais | podían | pude | pudo | pudimos | pudiste | pudísteis | pudiera | pudieran | pudieras | pudiéramos | pudiérais | pudieron | podré | podrás | podrá | podremos | podréis | podrán | podría | podrías | podríamos | podríais | podrían | pueda | puedas | podamos | podáis | puedan | pudiese | pudieses | pudiésemos | pudiéseis | pudiesen | podido ; 

define Ir 
ir | yendo | voy | vas | va | vamos | vais | van | iba | ibas | íbamos | ívais | iban | iré | irás | irá | iremos | iréis | irán | iría | irías | irían | iríamos | iríais | vaya | vayas | vayan | vayamos | vayáis ; 

define Haber 
haber | habiendo | has | han | había | habían | habíamos | habré | habrá | habrás | habremos | habréis | habrán | habría | habríamos | habríais | habrían | habrías | hayas | hayamos | hayáis | hayan | hubiera | hubieras | hubieran | hubiéramos | hubiérais | hubiese | hubieses | hubiésemos | hubiéseis | hubiesen | habido ; 

define AuxiliaryVerb 
Ser | Estar | Tener | Haber ; 

define WhWord 
qué | quién | quiénes | cuándo | dónde | adónde | cuánto | cuánta | cuántos | cuántas | cuán | cuál | cuáles | cómo ; 

define FunctionWord 
DefiniteArticle | 
IndefiniteArticle | 
PersonalPronoun | 
PersonalReflexivePronoun | 
DemonstrativePronoun | 
PossessiveAdjective | 
Preposition | 
UnstressedConjunction | 
Conjunction | 
AuxiliaryVerb ; 

regex 
DefiniteArticle -> def ,, 
IndefiniteArticle -> indef ,, 
PersonalPronoun -> pp ,, 
PersonalReflexivePronoun -> prp ,, 
DemonstrativePronoun -> dp ,, 
PossessiveAdjective -> pos ,, 
Preposition -> prep ,, 
[UnstressedConjunction - se] -> uconj ,, 
Conjunction -> conj ,, 
Ser -> cop ,, 
Estar -> cop ,, 
Tener -> aux ,, 
Haber -> aux ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content ; 
